Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-407
Hunting, fishing, and fur-harvesting permits; fees.

(1) The commission may offer multiple-year permits or combinations of permits at reduced rates and may establish fees pursuant to section 37-327 to be paid to the state for resident and nonresident annual hunting permits, annual fishing permits, three-day fishing permits, one-day fishing permits, combination hunting and fishing permits, fur-harvesting permits, and nonresident two-day hunting permits issued for periods of two consecutive days, as provided in this section.

(2) The fee for a multiple-year permit shall be established by the commission pursuant to section 37-327 and shall not be more than the number of years the permit will be valid times the fee required for an annual permit as provided in subsection (3) or (4) of this section. Payment for a multiple-year permit shall be made in a lump sum at the time of application. A replacement multiple-year permit may be issued under section 37-409 if the original is lost or destroyed.

(3) Resident fees shall be (a) not more than eighteen dollars for an annual hunting permit, (b) not more than twenty-four dollars for an annual fishing permit, (c) not more than fifteen dollars for a three-day fishing permit, (d) not more than nine dollars for a one-day fishing permit, (e) not more than thirty-nine dollars for an annual fishing and hunting permit, and (f) not more than twenty dollars for an annual fur-harvesting permit.

(4) Nonresident fees shall be (a) not more than two hundred sixty dollars for a period of time specified by the commission for fur harvesting one thousand or less fur-bearing animals and not more than seventeen dollars and fifty cents additional for each one hundred or part of one hundred fur-bearing animals harvested, (b)(i) for persons sixteen years of age and older, not more than one hundred thirty-eight dollars for an annual hunting permit and (ii) for persons under sixteen years of age, not less than the fee required pursuant to subdivision (3)(a) of this section for an annual hunting permit, (c) not more than ninety-five dollars for a two-day hunting permit plus the cost of a habitat stamp, (d) not more than fifteen dollars for a one-day fishing permit, (e) not more than twenty-nine dollars for a three-day fishing permit, (f) not more than eighty-six dollars for an annual fishing permit, and (g)(i) for persons sixteen years of age and older, not more than two hundred seven dollars for an annual fishing and hunting permit and (ii) for persons under sixteen years of age, not less than the fee required pursuant to subdivision (3)(e) of this section for an annual fishing and hunting permit.

(5) The commission may offer permits or combinations of permits at temporarily reduced rates for specific events or during specified timeframes.

Laws 1929, c. 112, II, § 4, p. 410;

C.S.1929, § 37-204;

Laws 1935, c. 84, § 2, p. 275;

Laws 1939, c. 44, § 1, p. 203;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 37-204;

Laws 1943, c. 94, § 3, p. 323;

R.S.1943, § 37-204;

Laws 1945, c. 78, § 1, p. 288;

Laws 1947, c. 132, § 1, p. 374;

Laws 1949, c. 101, § 1, p. 278;

Laws 1955, c. 130, § 1, p. 376;

Laws 1957, c. 140, § 2, p. 475;

Laws 1959, c. 150, § 1, p. 568;

Laws 1963, c. 203, § 1, p. 654;

Laws 1963, c. 202, § 2, p. 652;

Laws 1965, c. 195, § 1, p. 594;

Laws 1967, c. 215, § 1, p. 576;

Laws 1969, c. 290, § 1, p. 1060;

Laws 1972, LB 777, § 1;

Laws 1974, LB 811, § 4;

Laws 1975, LB 489, § 1;

Laws 1976, LB 861, § 4;

Laws 1977, LB 129, § 1;

Laws 1979, LB 78, § 1;

Laws 1979, LB 553, § 1;

Laws 1981, LB 72, § 4;

Laws 1987, LB 105, § 2;

Laws 1989, LB 34, § 5;

Laws 1993, LB 235, § 6;

Laws 1995, LB 579, § 1;

Laws 1995, LB 583, § 1;

R.S.Supp.,1996, § 37-204;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 117;

Laws 2001, LB 111, § 1;

Laws 2002, LB 1003, § 19;

Laws 2003, LB 306, § 1;

Laws 2005, LB 162, § 2;

Laws 2007, LB299, § 2;

Laws 2009, LB105, § 5;

Laws 2011, LB41, § 4;

Laws 2016, LB745, § 4;

Laws 2020, LB287, § 6;

Laws 2023, LB565, § 23.

Legislature was constitutionally free to determine by what authority licenses should be imposed upon those desiring to hunt and fish. State ex rel. Stevens v. Nickerson, 97 Neb. 837, 151 N.W. 981 (1915).